zh-TW: 電子器材 > 視訊/影音 > 影視編輯製作硬體設備: 影片處理器及縮放器; 影片切換器及混音器; 影片牆控制器
nb: Elektronikk > Video > Maskinvare for videoredigering og produksjonsutstyr: Videoprosessorer og -skalerere; Videovekslere og -miksere; Videoveggkontrollere
it: Elettronica > Video > Apparecchi montaggio video e produzione: Processori e scaler video; Mixer e commutatori video; Controller per video wall
fr: Appareil électronique > Vidéo > Matériel de montage et de production vidéo: Processeurs et scalers vidéo; Commutateurs et mélangeurs vidéo; Contrôleurs de mur vidéo
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Vídeo > Equipamento de produção e de edição de vídeo: Processadores e escaladores de vídeo; Comutadores e misturadores de vídeo; Controladores de parede de vídeo
fi: Elektroniikka > Video > Videoeditointilaitteet ja tuotantovälineet: Videoprosessori ja skaalain; Videokytkin ja mikseri; Videoseinänohjain
hr-HR: Elektronika > Video > Hardver za video uređivanje i oprema za produkciju: Videoprocesori i dozimetri; Videopreklopnici i mikseri; Kontroleri videozida
es: Electrónica > Video > Equipo de producción y hardware de edición de vídeo: Procesadores y escaladores de video; Mezcladores y conmutadores de video; Controladores de videowall
hu: Elektronika > Videó > Videószerkesztő hardver és gyártóberendezések: Videófeldolgozók és -méretezők; Videókapcsolók és -keverők; Videófal-vezérlők
da: Elektronik > Video > Videoredigering – hardware og produktion: Videoprocessorer og -skaleringsenheder; Videoswitches og -mixere; Video-vægcontrollere
lt-LT: Elektronika > Vaizdo įranga > Vaizdo įrašų redagavimo aparatinė ir gamybos įranga: Vaizdo procesoriai ir mastelio keitikliai; Vaizdo jungikliai ir maišytuvai; Vaizdo sienos valdikliai
ro-RO: Electronice > Video > Echipamente de editare video și echipamente de producție: Procesoare și scalere video; Switch-uri și mixere video; Controlere pentru pereți video
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Vídeo > Hardware de edição e equipamentos de produção de vídeo: Processadores e escaladores de vídeo; Selecionadores e mixers de vídeo; Controladores de parede de vídeo
bg-BG: Електроника > Видео > Устройства за видеомонтаж и оборудване за видеопродукция: Видео процесори и преобразуватели; Видео превключватели и миксери; Контролери за видео стена
sl-SI: Elektronika > Video > Oprema za video montažo in produkcijska oprema: Video procesorji in skalirniki; Video preklopniki in mešalniki; Krmilniki videosten
pl: Elektronika > Video > Sprzęt do edycji i produkcji filmów: Procesory wideo i skalery; Przełączniki wideo i miksery; Kontrolery ścian wideo
en: Electronics > Video > Video Editing Hardware & Production Equipment: Video Processors & Scalers; Video Switchers & Mixers; Video Wall Controllers
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 视频 > 视频编辑硬件与制作设备: 视频处理器和缩放器; 视频切换器和混合器; 视频墙控制器
nl: Elektronica > Video > Hardware voor videobewerking en productieapparatuur: Videoprocessoren en scalers; Videoswitchers en mixers; Videowallcontrollers
ru: Электроника > Видеоаппаратура > Аппаратура для видеомонтажа и видеопроизводства: Видеопроцессоры и масштабаторы; Видеокоммутаторы и микшеры; Контроллеры видеостен
sk-SK: Elektronika > Video zariadenia > Hardvér a výrobné vybavenie na úpravu videa: Videoprocesory a scalery; Video switchery a mixéry; Ovládače videostien
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > วิดีโอ > ฮาร์ดแวร์ตัดต่อวิดีโอและอุปกรณ์การผลิต: ตัวประมวลผลและปรับสเกลวิดีโอ; ตัวสวิตช์และมิกเซอร์วิดีโอ; ตัวควบคุมวิดีโอวอลล์
sv: Elektronik > Video > Maskinvara för videoredigering och produktionsutrustning: Videoprocessorer och -skalare; Videoomkopplare och -mixrar; Videoväggstyrsystem
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Βίντεο > Εξοπλισμός υλικού επεξεργασίας & παραγωγής βίντεο: Επεξεργαστές & μετατροπείς κλίμακας βίντεο; Διακόπτες & μίκτες βίντεο; Ελεγκτές video wall
tr: Elektronik > Video > Video Montaj Donanımı ve Prodüksiyon Ekipmanları: Video İşlemcileri ve Ölçeklendiricileri; Video Anahtarlayıcıları ve Karıştırıcıları; Video Duvar Kontrol Cihazları
cs: Elektronika > Video > Vybavení pro střih a produkci videa: Video procesory a škálovače; Video přepínače a mixéry; Ovladače videostěn
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Video > Thiết bị sản xuất & Phần mềm chỉnh sửa video: Bộ xử lý và mở rộng quy mô video; Công tắc và trộn video; Bộ điều khiển tường video
ko: 전자기기 > 비디오 > 동영상 편집 하드웨어/제작 장비: 비디오 프로세서 및 스케일러; 비디오 스위처 및 믹서; 비디오 월 컨트롤러
ja: 電子機器 > ビデオ > 映像編集・制作機器: ビデオプロセッサーとスケーラー; ビデオスイッチャーとミキサー; ビデオウォールコントローラー
de: Elektronik > Video > Videobearbeitungshardware & Videoproduktionsausrüstung: Videoprozessoren und -skalierer; Video-Switcher und -mischer; Videowand-Controller